cs: Typ spony na vodítko: Zacvakávací karabina; Karabina; Uzamykatelný klip; Karabina se šroubovací pojistkou; Stahovací kroužek; Otočný klip; Nůžková karabina; Jiné
ko: 리드 클립 타입: 볼트 스냅; 카라비너; 잠금 클립; 스크루 게이트 카라비너; 슬립 링; 스위블 클립; 트리거 스냅; 기타
pl: Typ klipsa smyczy: Karabińczyk tłokowy; Karabińczyk; Klips z blokadą; Karabińczyk zakręcany; Kółko ślizgowe; Klips obrotowy; Karabińczyk nożycowy; Inne
el: Τύπος κλιπ λουριού: Γάντζος με ελατήριο; Καραμπίνερ; Κλιπ ασφαλείας; Καραμπίνερ με βιδωτή ασφάλεια; Ολισθαίνων δακτύλιος; Περιστρεφόμενο κλιπ; Γάντζος με σκανδάλη; Άλλο
en: Leash clip type: Bolt Snap; Carabiner; Locking Clip; Screw Gate Carabiner; Slip Ring; Swivel Clip; Trigger Snap; Other
it: Tipo di clip per guinzaglio: Moschettone a levetta; Moschettone; Clip di blocco; Moschettone a ghiera; Anello scorrevole; Clip girevole; Moschettone a grilletto; Altro
fr: Type d’attache de laisse: Mousqueton à pompe; Mousqueton; Mousqueton de verrouillage; Mousqueton à vis; Anneau coulissant; Mousqueton pivotant; Mousqueton à gâchette; Autre
vi: Loại kẹp dây: Móc khóa trượt; Móc khóa carabiner; Kẹp khóa; Móc khóa carabiner dạng vặn; Vòng trượt; Kẹp xoay; Móc cò; Khác
es: Tipo de clip para correa: Gancho de presión; Mosquetón; Clip con seguro; Mosquetón con seguro de rosca; Anilla deslizante; Clip giratorio; Gancho con gatillo; Otro
fi: Talutushihnan pidikkeen tyyppi: Pulttilukko; Karbiinihaka; Lukittava klipsi; Ruuvisulkurengas; Liukurengas; Leikarilukko; Liipaisinlukko; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de mosquetão da trela: Mosquetão com pino; Mosquetão; Clipe de bloqueio; Mosquetão com fecho de rosca; Argola deslizante; Clipe giratório; Mosquetão com gatilho; Outro
sv: Typ av koppelklämma: Pistolhake; Karbinhake; Säkerhetsklämma; Skruvkarbinhake; Löpring; Svivelklämma; Avtryckarhake; Övrigt
pt-BR: Guia tipo de clipe: Mosquetão com gatilho; Mosquetão; Clipe com trava; Mosquetão com trava de rosca; Argola deslizante; Clipe giratório; Mosquetão tipo gatilho; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta kopče za povodac: Kopča s oprugom; Karabiner; Kopča sa zaključavanjem; Karabiner s maticom; Klizni prsten; Okretna kopča; Kopča s okidačem; Ostalo
de: Typ des Leinenclips: Bolzenkarabiner; Karabiner; Verschlussclip; Schraubkarabiner; Gleitring; Drehclip; Zangenkarabiner; Sonstige
hu: Pórázcsat típusa: Tolózáras karabiner; Karabiner; Zárható csat; Csavaros karabiner; Csúszógyűrű; Forgókarabiner; Ollós karabiner; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип карабинер на повода: Карабинка с резе; Карабинер; Заключваща се карабинка; Карабинер с винт; Халка; Въртяща се карабинка; Карабинка със спусък; Друг
tr: Tasma klipsi tipi: Sürgülü kanca; Karabina; Kilitli klips; Vidalı karabina; Kayar halka; Döner klips; Tetikli kanca; Diğer
ja: リードクリップタイプ: ボルトスナップ; カラビナ; ロッキングクリップ; スクリューゲートカラビナ; スリップリング; スイベルクリップ; トリガースナップ; その他
ro-RO: Tipul de clemă pentru lesă: Carabină standard; Carabinieră; Clemă de blocare; Carabinieră cu șurub; Inel glisant; Clemă rotativă; Carabină cu trăgaci; Altele
nl: Lijnclip type: Musketonhaak; Karabijnhaak; Vergrendelbare clip; Schroefkarabijnhaak; Slipring; Draaibare clip; Teugelhaak; Overig
zh-CN: 牵引绳夹扣类型: 滑栓弹簧扣; 登山扣; 带锁扣; 螺旋锁门登山扣; 滑环; 旋转扣; 扳机扣; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta sponke povodca: Karabin z zatičem; Karabin; Zaponka z zaklepom; Karabin z matico; Drsni obroček; Vrtljiva zaponka; Karabin s sprožilcem; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ karabíny na vôdzku: Čapová karabína; Karabína; Uzamykacia karabína; Skrutkovacia karabína; Posuvný krúžok; Otočná karabína; Karabína s kohútikom; Iné
ru: Тип клипсы поводка: Карабин-защелка; Карабин; Зажим с фиксатором; Карабин с винтовой муфтой; Скользящее кольцо; Карабин с вертлюгом; Карабин с курком; Другое
zh-TW: 牽引繩扣具類型: 彈簧鉤; 登山扣; 帶鎖扣環; 螺旋鎖登山扣; 滑環; 旋轉扣環; 扳機扣; 其他
th: ประเภทของตัวล็อกสายจูง: สลักสแน็ป; คาราไบเนอร์; คลิปล็อก; คาราไบเนอร์แบบเกลียวล็อก; แหวนลื่น; คลิปแบบหมุน; สแน็ปแบบไกปืน; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Pavadėlio segtuko tipas: Slankiojamasis karabinas; Karabinas; Fiksuojamasis segtukas; Užsukamas karabinas; Slystamasis žiedas; Sukamasis segtukas; Svirtinis karabinas; Kita
da: Snorklemmetype: Bolthage; Karabinhage; Låseklemme; Skruekarabinhage; Glidering; Svirvelklemme; Fjederhage; Andet
nb: Type kobbelfeste: Boltkrok; Karabinkrok; Låseklemme; Karabinkrok med skrulås; Glidering; Svivelklemme; Pistolkrok; Annet